Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1102
Corporations; personal property; Secretary of State; financing statement; filed with; effect.

A security interest in goods alone created by a corporation which is a railroad, or by any corporation including public corporations engaged in the furnishing of electric or telephone service shall be perfected by filing a financing statement in the office of the Secretary of State and shall in all respects except as to place of filing be governed by the Uniform Commercial Code. This is a statute providing for central filing of security interests in property within the meaning of article 9, Uniform Commercial Code.

Laws 1965, c. 452, § 2, p. 1434;

Laws 1999, LB 550, § 42.